North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 8. District Attorneys.

§ 147-89.
To prosecute cases removed to federal courts.

It shall be the duty of the district attorneys of this State, in whose jurisdiction the circuit and district courts of the United States are held, having first obtained the permission of the judges of said courts, to prosecute, or assist in the prosecution of, all criminal cases in said courts where the defendants are charged with violations of the laws of this State, and have moved their cases from the State to the federal courts under the provisions of the various acts of Congress on such subjects.

History.

1874-5, c. 164, s. 1; Code, s. 1239; Rev., s. 5381; C.S., s. 7696; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 147-90.
Investigations of uses of deadly force.

In every instance in which a private citizen is killed as a result of the use of a firearm by a law enforcement officer in the line of duty, the district attorney in the prosecutorial district in which the death occurred shall, upon the request of the surviving spouse or next of kin of the private citizen within 180 days of the death, request the State Bureau of Investigation to conduct an investigation into the incident. For purposes of this section, the term “next of kin” includes only the child, father, mother, sister, or brother of the private citizen.

Statements prepared by or on behalf of a district attorney pursuant to this section are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

and may be released by the district attorney only as provided by

G.S. 132-1.4

or other applicable law.

History.

2007-129, s. 1.